Oklahoma, session 2025, SB65.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-315, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-315. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, any


person required to obtain an annual registration pursuant to Section


2-302 of this title, or any group home, or residential care home as


defined by Section 1-820 of this title shall submit for destruction


destroy all controlled dangerous substances which are out of date,



Req. No. 688 Page 1


which are unwanted, or unused or which are abandoned by their owner


at their facility due to death or other circumstances.


B. All controlled dangerous substances described in subsection


A of this section shall be submitted to the Oklahoma City laboratory


of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, along with all


required information on forms provided by the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Investigation, to the federal Drug Enforcement Administration, to


a duly registered reverse distributor, to the original registered


supplier or their registered agent, to a duly registered retail


pharmacy, or to a hospital or clinic with an on-site pharmacy


destroyed pursuant to the rules set forth in 21 C.F.R. Part 1317 of


Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. When any such


substance is transported by private contract or common carrier or


United States Postal Service for the purpose of destruction, the


sender shall require a receipt from such private contract or common


carrier or United States Postal Service, and such receipt shall be


retained as a permanent record by the sender.


C. Controlled dangerous substances submitted to the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Investigation pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall be destroyed pursuant to the procedures provided in


subsection A of Section 2-508 of this title.


Controlled dangerous substances submitted to any distributors,


reverse distributors, or their original registered suppliers


pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be destroyed by

Req. No. 688 Page 2


incineration so as to make the substance absolutely unusable for


human purposes pursuant to the rules set forth in 21 C.F.R. Part


1317. An official record listing the property destroyed, the


location of destruction and disposal, and the name and title of the


person supervising the destruction and disposal shall be submitted


to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs


Control and the federal Drug Enforcement Administration office


located nearest the destruction site.


D. The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner is hereby


authorized to perform on-site incineration destruction of all


controlled dangerous substances which are obtained in the discharge


of the official duties of the Chief Medical Examiner. The


controlled dangerous substances shall be destroyed pursuant to 21


C.F.R. Part 1317. Any record relating to destruction of a


controlled dangerous substance shall be maintained as required by


the state or federal government and shall be available for


inspection by appropriate state or federal government regulatory


agencies.


E. This section shall constitute a part of the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-508, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-508. A. Except as otherwise provided, all property


described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection A of Section 2-503 of

Req. No. 688 Page 3


this title which is seized or surrendered pursuant to the provisions


of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act shall be


destroyed pursuant to 21 C.F.R. Part 1317. The destruction shall be


done by or at the direction of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control (OSBNDD), who shall have the


discretion prior to destruction to preserve samples of the substance


for testing. In any county with a population of four hundred


thousand (400,000) or more according to the latest Federal Decennial


Census, there shall be a located site, approved by the OSBNDD, for


the destruction of the property. Any such property submitted to the


OSBNDD which it deems to be of use for investigative training, or


educational, or analytical purposes may be retained by the OSBNDD in


lieu of destruction.


B. 1. With respect to controlled dangerous substances seized


or surrendered pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act, municipal police departments, sheriffs,


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control


Commission, the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, and the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation shall have the authority to destroy seized


controlled dangerous substances when the amount seized in a single


incident exceeds ten (10) pounds. The destroying agency shall:


a. photograph the seized substance with identifying case


numbers or other means of identification,



Req. No. 688 Page 4


b. prepare a report describing the seized substance prior


to the destruction,


c. retain at least one (1) pound of the substance


randomly selected from the seized substance for the


purpose of evidence, and


d. obtain and retain samples of the substance from enough


containers, bales, bricks, or other units of substance


seized to establish the presence of a weight of the


substance necessary to establish a violation of the


Trafficking in Illegal Drugs Act pursuant to


subsection C of Section 2-415 of this title, if such a


weight is present. If such weight is not present,


samples of the substance from each container, bale,


brick, or other unit of substance seized shall be


taken. Each sample taken pursuant to this section


shall be large enough for the destroying agency and


the defendant or suspect to have an independent test


performed on the substance for purposes of


identification.


2. If a defendant or suspect is known to the destroying agency,


the destroying agency shall give at least seven (7) days’ written


notice to the defendant, suspect, or counsel for the defendant or


suspect of:



Req. No. 688 Page 5


a. the date, the time, and the place where the


photographing will take place and notice of the right


to attend the photographing, and


b. the right to obtain samples of the controlled


dangerous substance for independent testing and use as


evidence.


3. The written notice shall also inform the defendant, suspect,


or counsel for the defendant or suspect that the destroying agency


must be notified in writing within seven (7) days from receipt of


the notice of the intent of the suspect or defendant to obtain


random samples and make arrangements for the taking of samples. The


samples for the defendant or suspect must be taken by a person


licensed by the Drug Enforcement Administration. If the defendant


or counsel for the defendant fails to notify the destroying agency


in writing of an intent to obtain samples and fails to make


arrangements for the taking of samples, a sample taken pursuant to


subparagraph d of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall be made


available upon request of the defendant or suspect.


The representative samples, the photographs, the reports, and


the records made under this section and properly identified shall be


admissible in any court or administrative proceeding for any


purposes for which the seized substance itself would have been


admissible.



Req. No. 688 Page 6


C. All other property not otherwise provided for in the Uniform


Controlled Dangerous Substances Act which has come into the


possession of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement


Commission, the Department of Corrections, the Office of the


Attorney General, or a district attorney may be disposed of by order


of the district court when no longer needed in connection with any


litigation. If the owner of the property is unknown to the agency


or district attorney, the agency or district attorney shall hold the


property for at least six (6) months prior to filing a petition for


disposal with the district court except for laboratory equipment


which may be forfeited when no longer needed in connection with


litigation, unless the property is perishable. The Director


director or Commissioner commissioner of the agency, the Attorney


General, or district attorney shall file a petition in the district


court of Oklahoma County or in the case of a district attorney, the


petition shall be filed in a county within the jurisdiction of the


district attorney requesting the authority to:


1. Conduct a sale of the property at a public auction or use an


Internet auction, which may include online bidding; or


2. Convert title of the property to the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Department of Public


Safety, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic

Req. No. 688 Page 7


Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Department of Corrections,


the Office of the Attorney General, or to the district attorney’s


office for the purposes provided for in subsection J, K, or L of


this section.


The Director director, Commissioner commissioner, Attorney


General or district attorney shall attach to the petition:


a. a list describing the property, including all


identifying numbers and marks, if any,


b. the date the property came into the possession of the


agency or district attorney, and


c. the name and address of the owner, if known.


For any item having an apparent value in excess of One Hundred


Dollars ($100.00), but less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the


notice of the hearing of the petition for the sale of the property,


except laboratory equipment used in the processing, manufacturing,


or compounding of controlled dangerous substances in violation of


the provisions of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be given to every known owner, as set forth in the petition,


by first-class mail to the last-known address of the owner at least


ten (10) days prior to the date of the hearing. An affidavit of


notice being sent shall be filed with the court by a representative


of the agency, the Director or Commissioner of the agency, the


Attorney General, or district attorney. For items in excess of Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00), a notice of the hearing of the petition

Req. No. 688 Page 8


for the sale of said such property shall be delivered to every known


owner as set forth in the petition by certified mail. Notice of a


hearing on a petition for forfeiture or sale of laboratory equipment


used in the processing, manufacturing, or compounding of controlled


dangerous substances in violation of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act shall not be required.


The notice shall contain a brief description of the property,


and the location and date of the hearing. In addition, notice of


the hearing shall be posted in three public places in the county,


one such place being the county courthouse at the regular place


assigned for the posting of legal notices. At the hearing, if no


owner appears and establishes ownership of the property, the court


may enter an order authorizing the Director, Commissioner, Attorney


General, or district attorney to donate the property pursuant to


subsection J, K, or L of this section,; to sell the property at a


public auction, including an Internet auction, which may include


online bidding, to the highest bidder,; or to convert title of the


property to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement


Commission, the Department of Corrections, or the Office of the


Attorney General for the purposes provided for in subsection J, K,


or L of this section after at least ten (10) days of notice has been


given by publication in one issue of a legal newspaper of the

Req. No. 688 Page 9


county. If the property is offered for sale at public auction,


including an Internet auction, and no bid is received that exceeds


fifty percent (50%) of the value of the property, such value to be


announced prior to the sale, the Director, Commissioner, Attorney


General, or district attorney may refuse to sell the item pursuant


to any bid received. The Director, Commissioner, Attorney General,


or district attorney shall make a return of the sale and, when


confirmed by the court, the order confirming the sale shall vest in


the purchaser title to the property so purchased.


D. The money received from the sale of property by the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control shall be used


for general drug enforcement purposes. These funds shall be


transferred to the Bureau of Narcotics Revolving Fund established


pursuant to Section 2-107 of this title or in the case of a district


attorney, the revolving fund provided for in paragraph 3 of


subsection L of Section 2-506 of this title.


E. At the request of the Department of Public Safety, the


district attorney or a designee of the district attorney may conduct


any forfeiture proceedings as described in Section 2-503 of this


title on any property subject to forfeiture as described in


subsection A, B, or C of Section 2-503 of this title. The money


received from the sale of property by the Department of Public


Safety shall be deposited in the Department of Public Safety



Req. No. 688 Page 10


Restricted Revolving Fund and shall be expended for law enforcement


purposes.


F. The money received from the sale of property by the


Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission shall be deposited in


the General Revenue Fund of the state.


G. The money received from the sale of property from the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall be deposited in the


OSBI Revolving Fund and shall be expended for law enforcement


purposes.


H. The Director of the Department of Corrections shall make a


return of the sale and when confirmed by the court, the order


confirming the sale shall vest in the purchaser title to the


property so purchased. Twenty-five percent (25%) of the money


received from the sale shall be disbursed to a revolving fund in the


office of the county treasurer of the county wherein the property


was seized, said such fund to be used as a revolving fund solely for


enforcement of controlled dangerous substances laws, drug abuse


prevention, and drug abuse education. The remaining seventy-five


percent (75%) shall be deposited in the Department of Corrections


Revolving Fund to be expended for equipment for probation and parole


officers and correctional officers.


I. The money received from the sale of property from the Office


of the Attorney General shall be deposited in the Attorney General


Law Enforcement Revolving Fund and shall be expended for law

Req. No. 688 Page 11


enforcement purposes. The Office of the Attorney General may enter


into agreements with municipal, county, or state agencies to return


to such an agency a percentage of proceeds of the sale of any


property seized by the agency and forfeited under the provisions of


this section.


J. Any property, including but not limited to uncontaminated


laboratory equipment used in the processing, manufacturing, or


compounding of controlled dangerous substances in violation of the


provisions of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, upon


a court order, may be donated for classroom or laboratory use by the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control,


Department of Public Safety, district attorney, the Alcoholic


Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Department of Corrections,


or the Office of the Attorney General to any public secondary school


or technology center school in this state or any institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education.


K. Any vehicle or firearm which has come into the possession


and title vested in the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the Office of the Attorney


General, or a district attorney, may be transferred, donated, or


offered for lease to any sheriff’s office, tribal law enforcement


agency, campus police department pursuant to the provisions of the

Req. No. 688 Page 12


Oklahoma Campus Security Act, or police department in this state on


an annual basis to assist with the enforcement of the provisions of


the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act. Each agency shall


promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures for leasing vehicles


and firearms. No fully automatic weapons will be subject to the


leasing agreement. All firearms leased may be utilized only by


C.L.E.E.T.-certified CLEET-certified officers who have received


training in the type and class of weapon leased. Every lessee shall


be required to submit an annual report to the leasing agency stating


the condition of all leased property. A lease agreement may be


renewed annually at the option of the leasing agency. Upon


termination of a lease agreement, the property shall be returned to


the leasing agency for sale or other disposition. All funds derived


from lease agreements or other disposition of property no longer


useful to law enforcement shall be deposited in the agency’s


revolving fund, or in the case of the Department of Public Safety,


the Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving Fund, and shall


be expended for law enforcement purposes.


L. Before disposing of any property pursuant to subsections C


through I of this section, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics


and Dangerous Drugs Control, the Department of Public Safety, the


Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission, the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation, the Department of Corrections, the Office


of the Attorney General, or a district attorney may transfer or

Req. No. 688 Page 13


donate the property to another state agency, tribal law enforcement


agency, or school district for use upon request. In addition to the


provisions of this section, the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics


and Dangerous Drugs Control may transfer or donate property for any


purpose pursuant to Section 2-106.2 of this title. The agencies and


any district attorney that are parties to any transfer of property


pursuant to this subsection shall enter into written agreements to


carry out any such transfer of property. Any such agreement may


also provide for the granting of title to any property being


transferred as the parties deem appropriate. If the transfer of


property is to a school district, a written agreement shall be


entered into with the superintendent of the school district. No


weapons may be transferred to a school district except as provided


for in subsection K of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-688 CN 1/19/2025 5:40:42 AM















Req. No. 688 Page 14